Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 5 Credit Unions
19-5-29.
Savings promotion raffle.

If authorized by the credit union board of directors, a credit union registered to do business in the State of Rhode Island may conduct a savings promotion raffle, provided that it has given the department of business regulation prior written notice of its intent to conduct such a raffle. Said notice shall include an attestation that the raffle meets all requirements of all applicable laws and regulations including, but not limited to, the national credit union administration (NCUA) regulations and guidelines related to such contests; that the raffle will be administered in a manner that is fair and non-discriminatory to credit union members; and that there will be no adverse impact on the financial condition of the credit union as a result of the proposed savings promotion raffle. The credit union shall conduct a savings promotion raffle so that each token or ticket representing an entry in the raffle has an equal chance of being drawn. A credit union shall not conduct a savings promotion raffle in a manner that jeopardizes the credit union’s safety and financial soundness or misleads its members.

Pursuant to his or her supervisory powers the director of the department of business regulation may examine the conduct of a savings promotion raffle at any time. The director may issue a cease and desist order for a violation of this section.

A credit union shall maintain records sufficient to facilitate an audit of a savings promotion raffle.

As used in this section, “savings promotion raffle” means a raffle conducted by a credit union where the sole consideration required for a chance of winning designated prizes is the deposit of at least a specified amount of money in a savings account or other savings program offered by the credit union.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 71, § 1.